Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2614
Manufacturer; express warranty; requirements.

(1) A manufacturer who sells an assistive device to a consumer, either directly or through an assistive device dealer, shall furnish the consumer with an express warranty for the assistive device. The duration of the express warranty shall be not less than one year after first delivery of the assistive device to the consumer. If a manufacturer fails to furnish an express warranty as required by this section, the assistive device shall be covered by an express warranty for a period of one year as if the manufacturer had furnished an express warranty to the consumer as required by this section.

(2) An express warranty does not take effect until the consumer takes possession of the new assistive device.

(3) If a new assistive device does not conform to an applicable express warranty and the consumer reports the nonconformity to the manufacturer, the assistive device lessor, or any of the manufacturer's authorized assistive device dealers and makes the assistive device available for repair before one year after first delivery of the device to a consumer, the nonconformity shall be repaired or a refund or replacement shall be made pursuant to section 69-2615.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 14.